Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1035.02
Temporary school fund; use.

The temporary school fund is the holding fund to which the interest, dividends, and any other income from the permanent school fund, the net income from the school lands, and the money from all other sources required or provided by law are credited as described in Article VII, section 9, of the Constitution of Nebraska. The entire balance of the temporary school fund, including all interest and any other income therefrom, shall be exclusively used for the support and maintenance of the common schools in each public school district in the state as the Legislature provides, in accordance with Article VII, section 9, of the Constitution of Nebraska, and shall be distributed to each public school district annually.

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 32.